Maryland, session 2026, HB0415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–203.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in Division II of this article, Title 3, Title 4, or
Title 5 of this division, or subsection (b) of this section, more than one license may not be
issued:
(1) to an individual; or
(2) for the use of a partnership, a corporation, an unincorporated
association, or a limited liability company.
(b) (1) A single individual may hold Class B beer, wine, and liquor licenses or
Class BLX or equivalent licenses issued by different local licensing boards only for
restaurants, hotels, or motels.
(2) The number of licenses that a single individual may hold is limited only
by the cap imposed by each local licensing board on the licenses that the local licensing
board issues.
(3) The licenses may be issued for the use of:
(i) the license holder; or
(ii) a partnership, a corporation, an unincorporated association, or a
limited liability company.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in Division II of this article or Title 3, Title 4, or
Title 5 of this division, an individual may not be issued in the State more than one Class A,
Class C, or Class D license for the use of:
(1) that individual; or
(2) a partnership, a corporation, an unincorporated association, or a
limited liability company.
4–205.
(a) This section does not apply to:

HOUSE BILL 415 3
(1) an establishment that already holds a Class A, Class B, or Class D beer
license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license; or
(2) a license holder that sells alcoholic beverages at discount prices.
(b) A local licensing board may not issue a Class A, Class B, or Class D beer
license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license for use in conjunction with
or on the premises of:
(1) a chain store;
(2) a supermarket; or
(3) a discount house.
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1501.
(c) The following sections of Title 4, Subtitle 2 (“Issuance or Denial of Local
Licenses”) of Division I of this article apply in the county:
(1) § 4–202 (“Authority of local licensing boards”), in addition to §§ 26–1502
and 26–1503 of this subtitle;
(2) § 4–203 (“Prohibition against issuing multiple licenses to individual or
for use of entity”), subject to [§ 26–1505] §§ 26–1505 AND 26–1509.1 of this subtitle and
Subtitle 13, Part III and Subtitle 16, Part II of this title;
(3) § 4–204 (“Prohibition against issuing multiple licenses for same
premises”), subject to § 26–1505 of this subtitle and Subtitle 13, Part III of this title;
(4) § 4–205 (“Chain store, supermarket, or discount house”), subject to [§
26–1509] §§ 26–1509 AND 26–1509.1 of this subtitle;
(5) § 4–208 (“Notice of license application required”), subject to § 26–1512
of this subtitle;
(6) § 4–209 (“Hearing”), in addition to § 26–1511 of this subtitle;
(7) § 4–211 (“License forms; effective date; expiration”), in addition to §
26–1508 of this subtitle;
(8) § 4–212 (“License not property”), subject to § 26–1506 of this subtitle;
and

HOUSE BILL 415
(9) § 4–213 (“Replacement licenses”), subject to § 26–1517 of this subtitle.
26–1509.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section AND § 26–1509.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, the Board may not issue a license that has an off–sale privilege to:
(1) an establishment commonly known as a chain store, supermarket, or
discount house; or
(2) a franchisor, franchisee, or concessionaire of the establishment.
(b) An establishment described in subsection (a) of this section that held a license
on July 1, 1973:
(1) may continue to hold the license; and
(2) at the discretion of the Board, may change the class of the license.
26–1509.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN AREAS OF THE COUNTY LOCATED
INSIDE THE CAPITAL BELTWAY.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A CLASS A BEER LICENSE OR CLASS A BEER
AND WINE LICENSE TO AN APPLICANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION FOR USE
IN CONJUNCTION WITH OR ON THE PREMISES OF A SELF–SERVICE RETAIL
ESTABLISHMENT:
(1) THAT IS INDEPENDENTLY OWNED OR PART OF A CORPORATION
OPERATING A CHAIN OF RETAIL ESTABLISHMENTS UNDER THE SAME TRADE NAME;
(2) THAT OFFERS FOR SALE A FULL LINE OF FOOD PRODUCTS IN AT
LEAST SIX OF THE FOLLOWING CATEGORIES:
(I) FRESH FRUITS AND VEGETABLES;
(II) FRESH AND UNCOOKED MEAT, POULTRY, AND SEAFOOD;
(III) DAIRY PRODUCTS;
(IV) CANNED FOODS;
(V) FROZEN FOODS;

HOUSE BILL 415 5
(VI) DRY GROCERIES AND BAKED GOODS; OR
(VII) NONALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES;
(3) THAT HAS A MINIMUM OF 50% OF THE SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE
PUBLIC AREA OF THE RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT DEDICATED TO THE SALE OF FOOD
OR BEVERAGES LISTED IN ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(4) FOR WHICH AT LEAST 50% OF THE AVERAGE MONTHLY GROSS
RECEIPTS ARE DERIVED FROM THE SALE OF FOOD PRODUCTS.
(C) THE PROHIBITIONS AGAINST ONE PERSON OR ENTITY BEING ISSUED OR
USING MORE THAN ONE LICENSE UNDER § 4–203 OF THIS ARTICLE DO NOT APPLY
TO A CLASS A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE NUMBER OF LICENSES
ISSUED AND LICENSE APPLICATIONS PENDING UNDER THIS SECTION AND THE
AVERAGE MONTHLY PERCENTAGE OF GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM THE SALE OF
FOOD PRODUCTS FOR EACH LICENSE HOLDER DURING THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.